District of Columbia statutes.
38-609

Protection from liability.

Neither the District government or its agencies, officials, and employees nor any private school or its officials and employees shall be subject to civil or criminal liability for failing to recognize or communicate a need for treatment from information contained in a student’s health file, or to obtain treatment for a student solely on account of such information.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-66, § 10, 32 DCR 6086

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2409.

Prior Codifications